Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.028

Salaries of agency officials—Reports.

(1) The office of financial management shall study the duties and salaries of the directors of the several departments and the members of the several boards and commissions of state government, who are subject to appointment by the governor or whose salaries are fixed by the governor, and of the chief executive officers of the following agencies of state government:

The arts commission; the human rights commission; the board of accountancy; the eastern Washington historical society; the Washington state historical society; the recreation and conservation office; the criminal justice training commission; the traffic safety commission; the horse racing commission; the public disclosure commission; the state conservation commission; the commission on Hispanic affairs; the commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; the state board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers; the transportation improvement board; the public employment relations commission; and the energy facilities site evaluation council.

(2) The office of financial management shall report to the governor or the chairperson of the appropriate salary fixing authority at least once in each fiscal biennium on such date as the governor may designate, but not later than seventy-five days prior to the convening of each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year, its recommendations for the salaries to be fixed for each position.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 451; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 2; 2007 c 241 s 3; 2001 c 302 s 2; 1995 c 67 s 1. Prior: 1993 c 281 s 45; 1993 c 101 s 14; 1991 c 3 s 294; 1988 c 167 s 9; prior: 1987 c 504 s 15; 1987 c 249 s 7; 1986 c 155 s 9; 1982 c 163 s 21; 1980 c 87 s 20; prior: 1977 ex.s. c 127 s 1; 1977 c 75 s 36; 1970 ex.s. c 43 s 2; 1967 c 19 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.03.028; prior: 1961 c 307 s 1; 1955 c 340 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Intent—Effective date—2007 c 241: See notes following RCW 79A.25.005.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Findings—1993 c 101: See note following RCW 27.34.010.

Effective date—1993 c 101: See RCW 27.34.916.

Savings—Severability—1988 c 167: See notes following RCW 47.26.121.

Contingent effective date—Severability—1986 c 155: See notes following RCW 43.03.300.

Severability—Effective date—1982 c 163: See notes following RCW 2.10.052.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 43: See note following RCW 43.03.027.